Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2546.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; university of Arizona; PFAS testing The sum of $1,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the university of Arizona to conduct a health study of perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances levels in the blood of persons across this state who receive drinking water from private groundwater wells or public drinking water systems that have been contaminated with perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances in an amount that exceeds the maximum contaminant level as prescribed by the United States environmental protection agency national primary drinking water regulations (40 Code of Federal Regulations parts 141 and 142).